Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.030

Limitation of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by an individual otherwise regulated under this title and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by an individual employed by the government of the United States or state of Washington while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States or state of Washington;

(3) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work by a person who is a regular student in an educational program based on recognized national standards and approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;

(4) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or social work under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization.

[ 2001 c 251 s 3.]